Louisiana, session 2026, HB261.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:87.1(1)(b)(vii) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§87.1. Definitions
Wherever used in this Subpart, unless a different meaning clearly appears in
the context, the following terms, whether used in the singular or plural, shall have
the following meanings:
(1)
* * *
(b) Abortion shall not mean any one or more of the following acts, if
performed by a physician:
* * *
(vii)(aa) Termination of a pregnancy that is the result of an act that
constitutes any of the following offenses:
(I) R.S. 14:41 (Rape).
(II) R.S. 14:42 (First degree rape).
(III) R.S. 14:42.1 (Second degree rape).
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-728 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 261
(IV) R.S. 14:43 (Third degree rape).
(V) R.S. 14:43.1 (Sexual battery).
(VI) R.S. 14:80 (Felony carnal knowledge of a juvenile).
(VII) R.S. 14:81.2 (Molestation of a juvenile or a person with a physical or
mental disability).
(VIII) R.S. 14:89 (Crime against nature).
(IX) R.S. 14:89.1 (Aggravated crime against nature).
(bb) This Item shall not be construed to require any of the following:
(I) A police or investigatory report.
(II) Forensic evidence provided by the pregnant female.
(III) A prosecution of the alleged offense.
* * *